dot_config/enchant/hunspell/da_DK.aff
FLAG num
#Adjektiv, svagt bøjet uden komparation, dobbeltkonsonant
SFX 59 Y 20
SFX 59 0 be/10,34 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 ce/10,34 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 de/10,34 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 fe/10,34 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 ge/10,34 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 he/10,34 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 je/10,34 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 ke/10,34 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 le/10,34 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 me/10,34 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 ne/10,34 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 pe/10,34 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 qe/10,34 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 re/10,34 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 se/10,34 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 te/10,34 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 ve/10,34 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 we/10,34 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 xe/10,34 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 59 0 ze/10,34 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING

#Sammensætning, fugeelement -er-
SFX 60 Y 2
SFX 60 0 er/32,35,36 .
SFX 60 0 er/36,33,35 .

#Sammensætning, fugeelement -kons.f.+e
SFX 61 Y 80
SFX 61 0 be/36,32,35 b
SFX 61 0 ce/36,32,35 c
SFX 61 0 de/36,32,35 d
SFX 61 0 fe/36,32,35 f
SFX 61 0 ge/36,32,35 g
SFX 61 0 he/36,32,35 h
SFX 61 0 je/36,32,35 j
SFX 61 0 ke/36,32,35 k
SFX 61 0 le/36,32,35 l
SFX 61 0 me/36,32,35 m
SFX 61 0 ne/36,32,35 n
SFX 61 0 pe/36,32,35 p
SFX 61 0 qe/36,32,35 q
SFX 61 0 re/36,32,35 r
SFX 61 0 se/36,32,35 s
SFX 61 0 te/36,32,35 t
SFX 61 0 ve/36,32,35 v
SFX 61 0 we/36,32,35 w
SFX 61 0 xe/36,32,35 x
SFX 61 0 ze/36,32,35 z
SFX 61 0 be/36,33,35 b
SFX 61 0 ce/36,33,35 c
SFX 61 0 de/36,33,35 d
SFX 61 0 fe/36,33,35 f
SFX 61 0 ge/36,33,35 g
SFX 61 0 he/36,33,35 h
SFX 61 0 je/36,33,35 j
SFX 61 0 ke/36,33,35 k
SFX 61 0 le/36,33,35 l
SFX 61 0 me/36,33,35 m
SFX 61 0 ne/36,33,35 n
SFX 61 0 pe/36,33,35 p
SFX 61 0 qe/36,33,35 q
SFX 61 0 re/36,33,35 r
SFX 61 0 se/36,33,35 s
SFX 61 0 te/36,33,35 t
SFX 61 0 ve/36,33,35 v
SFX 61 0 we/36,33,35 w
SFX 61 0 xe/36,33,35 x
SFX 61 0 ze/36,33,35 z
SFX 61 0 be-/36,32,35 b
SFX 61 0 ce-/36,32,35 c
SFX 61 0 de-/36,32,35 d
SFX 61 0 fe-/36,32,35 f
SFX 61 0 ge-/36,32,35 g
SFX 61 0 he-/36,32,35 h
SFX 61 0 je-/36,32,35 j
SFX 61 0 ke-/36,32,35 k
SFX 61 0 le-/36,32,35 l
SFX 61 0 me-/36,32,35 m
SFX 61 0 ne-/36,32,35 n
SFX 61 0 pe-/36,32,35 p
SFX 61 0 qe-/36,32,35 q
SFX 61 0 re-/36,32,35 r
SFX 61 0 se-/36,32,35 s
SFX 61 0 te-/36,32,35 t
SFX 61 0 ve-/36,32,35 v
SFX 61 0 we-/36,32,35 w
SFX 61 0 xe-/36,32,35 x
SFX 61 0 ze-/36,32,35 z
SFX 61 0 be-/36,33,35 b
SFX 61 0 ce-/36,33,35 c
SFX 61 0 de-/36,33,35 d
SFX 61 0 fe-/36,33,35 f
SFX 61 0 ge-/36,33,35 g
SFX 61 0 he-/36,33,35 h
SFX 61 0 je-/36,33,35 j
SFX 61 0 ke-/36,33,35 k
SFX 61 0 le-/36,33,35 l
SFX 61 0 me-/36,33,35 m
SFX 61 0 ne-/36,33,35 n
SFX 61 0 pe-/36,33,35 p
SFX 61 0 qe-/36,33,35 q
SFX 61 0 re-/36,33,35 r
SFX 61 0 se-/36,33,35 s
SFX 61 0 te-/36,33,35 t
SFX 61 0 ve-/36,33,35 v
SFX 61 0 we-/36,33,35 w
SFX 61 0 xe-/36,33,35 x
SFX 61 0 ze-/36,33,35 z

#Sammensætning, fugeelement Ø el. s
SFX 62 Y 4
SFX 62 0 0/36,32,35 .
SFX 62 0 0/36,33,35 .
SFX 62 0 s/36,32,35 .
SFX 62 0 s/36,33,35 .

#Sammensætning, fugeelement Ø el. e
SFX 63 Y 4
SFX 63 0 0/32,36,35 .
SFX 63 0 0/36,33,35 .
SFX 63 0 e/35,36,32 .
SFX 63 0 e/36,33,35 .
